Nebraska, session 109, LB1204.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 25 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility
Standards Act:
(1) Affected landowner means:
(a) Any landowner whose property is subject to facilities, access
roads, or associated infrastructure of the renewable energy facility or
energy storage resource; or
(b) Any landowner whose property is directly impacted by drainage
tile damage, soil compaction, weed spread, or other agricultural impacts
from the construction or operation of the facility or resource;
(2) Energy storage resource means any energy storage resource
subject to the nameplate capacity tax imposed under section 77-6203;
(3) Nonparticipating landowner means a landowner who is not a party
to a lease, easement, or other agreement with the owner of the renewable
energy generation facility or energy storage resource for placement of
such facility or resource on the landowner's property;
(4) Occupied dwelling unit means a residence that is inhabited on a
regular basis as a primary or secondary residence;
(5) Permitted has the same meaning as in section 77-6202;
(6) Political subdivision means any county or other political
subdivision of the state, including municipalities that exercise zoning
authority beyond their corporate limits;
(7) Public road or right-of-way means a road, street, or highway
maintained by a public entity and open to public vehicular traffic;
(8) Renewable energy generation facility means any renewable energy
generation facility subject to the nameplate capacity tax imposed under
section 77-6203; and
(9) Total height means the height of a wind turbine of the wind
energy generation facility measured from ground level to the tip of the
blade at its highest point.
-2-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
Sec. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Renewable energy and energy storage development is a matter of
statewide concern affecting Nebraska's economic development, energy
security, agricultural economy, property tax base, and environmental
stewardship;
(2) Inconsistent and overly restrictive local regulations have
created substantial barriers to renewable energy and energy storage
development in Nebraska, making the state less competitive compared to
neighboring states with more uniform regulatory frameworks;
(3) Renewable energy facilities and energy storage resources
contribute substantial revenue to Nebraska counties and other political
subdivisions through nameplate capacity taxes, provide lease payments to
agricultural landowners, and support rural economic development;
(4) Uniform statewide maximum standards are necessary to:
(a) Ensure fair and predictable regulatory treatment of renewable
energy and energy storage development across all Nebraska counties and
political subdivisions;
(b) Prevent individual counties and other political subdivisions
from imposing overly restrictive requirements that would effectively
prohibit renewable energy and energy storage development and deny
landowners the opportunity to benefit economically from their property;
(c) Balance the legitimate interests of renewable energy and energy
storage developers, participating landowners, nonparticipating
landowners, local governments, and the residents of Nebraska;
(d) Promote Nebraska's economic development and energy independence
while protecting property rights, agricultural operations, and public
health and safety;
(e) Maintain Nebraska's competitiveness in attracting renewable
energy and energy storage investment compared to other states; and
(f) Ensure that counties and other political subdivisions benefit
from substantial nameplate capacity tax revenue while renewable energy
-3-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
and energy storage projects are subject to reasonable and predictable
standards;
(5) The establishment of maximum standards in the Nameplate Capacity
Tax Facility Standards Act does not prevent counties and other political
subdivisions from adopting less restrictive requirements or from
approving renewable energy facilities and energy storage resources
without imposing permitting requirements beyond those necessary to
protect public health and safety;
(6) The standards established in the Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility
Standards Act are based on sound engineering principles, scientific
evidence, and best practices from other states, and are designed to
protect nonparticipating landowners and the public while enabling
responsible renewable energy and energy storage development; and
(7) The nameplate capacity tax provides substantial and predictable
revenue to counties and other political subdivisions that helps justify
state establishment of maximum permitting and regulation standards and
ensures that renewable energy facilities and energy storage resources
contribute fairly to local services and infrastructure.
Sec. 4. (1) Political subdivisions shall not impose permitting,
zoning, and building requirements more restrictive than the standards
described in sections 5 to 16 of this act for renewable energy generation
facilities or energy storage resources.
(2) Political subdivisions may impose permitting, zoning, and
requirements less restrictive than the standards described in sections 5
to 16 of this act.
(3) Political subdivisions shall not impose cumulative or stacking
requirements on renewable energy generation facilities or energy storage
resources that, when combined, create standards more restrictive than the
standards described in sections 5 to 16 of this act.
(4) Political subdivisions shall not use terms such as special use
permit, conditional use permit, or variance to impose requirements on
-4-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
renewable energy generation facilities or energy storage resources more
restrictive than the standards described in sections 5 to 16 of this act.
(5) Political subdivisions shall apply the standards described in
sections 5 to 16 of this act uniformly to all renewable energy generation
facilities and energy storage resources of the same type, regardless of
ownership, size, or other characteristics, except as specifically
provided in the Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act.
(6) Requirements and standards imposed by federal law or federal
agencies, including the Federal Aviation Administration, shall supersede
the Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act to the extent of any
conflict between the act and such requirements and standards.
Sec. 5. (1) A renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource shall meet the following setback requirements:
(a) For wind energy generation facilities, the setback requirements
shall be:
(i) From the outside wall of participating and nonparticipating
landowners' occupied dwelling units, one and one-tenth the total height
of the renewable energy generation facility;
(ii) From nonparticipating landowners' property lines, one and one-
tenth times the total height of the renewable energy generation facility;
(iii) From the center of public roads or rights-of-way, one and one-
tenth times the total height of the renewable energy generation facility;
(iv) From occupied community buildings, one and one-tenth times the
total height of the renewable energy generation facility; and
(v) From overhead communication lines not related to the renewable
energy generation facility, one and one-tenth times the total height of
the renewable energy generation facility;
(b) For solar energy generation facilities, the setback requirements
shall be:
(i) From the outside wall of participating and nonparticipating
landowners' occupied dwelling units, two hundred feet;
-5-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
(ii) From nonparticipating landowners' property lines, twenty-five
feet;
(iii) From the center of public roads or rights-of-way, seventy
feet;
(iv) From occupied community buildings, two hundred feet; and
(v) From overhead communication lines not related to the renewable
energy generation facility, twenty-five feet;
(c) For energy storage resources, the setback requirements shall be:
(i) From the outside wall of participating and nonparticipating
landowners' occupied dwelling units, fifty feet;
(ii) From nonparticipating landowners' property lines, twenty-five
feet;
(iii) From the center of public roads or rights-of-way, twenty-five
feet;
(iv) From occupied community buildings, fifty feet; and
(v) From overhead communication lines not related to the energy
storage resource, twenty-five feet.
(2) Setback requirements shall be measured from the base of the
nearest wind turbine, solar panel, or energy storage container. Political
subdivisions shall recognize a waiver of setback requirements to the
extent an affected landowner has executed a written waiver of such
requirements.
Sec. 6. (1) Political subdivisions shall not impose a height limit
on wind turbines, solar panels, and energy storage containers and
transportation and distribution infrastructure of any renewable energy
generation facility or energy storage resource associated with such
turbines, panels, or containers lower than the limitations imposed in
this section. Federal Aviation Administration regulations shall supersede
any height limitations imposed in this section.
(2) For solar energy generation facilities, the height limitation
shall be at least twenty feet for any solar panel or related equipment.
-6-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
Sec. 7. (1) The county or counties where a renewable energy
generation facility or energy storage resource is located shall require
the owner of the facility or resource to provide an estimate and
financial assurance for the decommissioning of the facility or resource.
(2) The county or counties where a renewable energy generation
facility or energy storage resource is located may require the owner of
the renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource to
update the decommissioning estimate and financial assurance described in
subsection (1) of this section every five years or at longer intervals
while the facility or resource is in operation.
(3) The county or counties where a renewable energy generation
facility or energy storage resource is located shall not require the
owner of a renewable energy generation facility or energy storage
resource to provide the financial assurance described in subsection (1)
of this section prior to the fifteenth year of operation for the facility
or resource.
(4) Acceptable forms of financial assurance are surety bonds,
letters of credit, and parent company guarantees from companies with
investment-grade credit ratings. Escrow accounts and similar cash
requirements are not acceptable forms of financial security for purposes
of this section.
(5) Decommissioning shall be completed within eighteen months after
cessation of commercial operations of a renewable energy generation
facility or energy storage resource. The owner of the facility or
resource shall provide written notice of such cessation to the county or
counties where the facility or resource is located within ninety days
after the cessation.
(6) Decommissioning shall include removal of all aboveground
structures, removal of foundations to a depth of thirty-six inches, and
restoration of the site to a condition suitable for the land's prior use.
(7) Upon decommissioning, the owner of the renewable energy
-7-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
generation facility or energy storage resource shall restore the site to
a condition suitable for agricultural production, including removal of
gravel, restoration of topsoil, and establishment of ground cover to
prevent erosion.
Sec. 8. (1) Political subdivisions shall not restrict sound from
wind energy generation systems to quieter than fifty A-weighted decibels,
measured as a ten-minute equivalent continuous sound level at the
property line of any nonparticipating property.
(2) Political subdivisions shall recognize a waiver of noise
restrictions to the extent an affected property owner has executed a
written waiver of such restrictions.
(3) Noise measurements shall be conducted in accordance with
standards established by the American National Standards Institute or
other nationally recognized standards. Noise modeling shall be the
accepted means of compliance with this subsection and any ordinance,
regulation, or resolution a political subdivision may adopt. Political
subdivisions shall not require noise measurements except for
postconstruction compliance purposes.
Sec. 9. (1) Political subdivisions shall not regulate the
visibility or visual impact of renewable energy generation facilities or
energy storage resources, except that political subdivisions may require
screening of solar energy generation facilities from view of adjacent
homes, churches, schools, and parks by fencing, landscaping, or other
means, as long as such screening is economically practicable and does not
significantly reduce the energy production or storage of the facility or
resource.
(2) Political subdivisions shall not impose color requirements on
wind turbines except to require colors consistent with Federal Aviation
Administration regulations.
(3) Political subdivisions may prohibit outdoor advertising or
signage on renewable energy facilities except for reasonable
-8-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
identification, warning, or safety signage required by law or industry
standards.
Sec. 10. (1) Political subdivisions may restrict shadow flicker
from wind energy generation facilities to no more than thirty hours per
year at the outside wall of any nonparticipating occupied dwelling unit,
as predicted by modeling software.
(2) If actual shadow flicker exceeds thirty hours per year at the
outside wall of any nonparticipating occupied dwelling unit, the owner of
the facility shall implement mitigation measures, which may include
curtailment of specific turbines during times of shadow flicker
occurrence.
Sec. 11. All renewable energy generation facilities and energy
storage resources shall comply with the requirements of section 66-915.
Political subdivisions shall not require lighting of renewable energy
facilities or energy storage resources more restrictive than those in
section 66-915, as required by Federal Aviation Administration
regulations, or as necessary for safety purposes in accordance with the
National Electrical Code.
Sec. 12. (1)(a) Before commencing construction, the owner of a
renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource shall
conduct a video survey of the condition of county roads and bridges
anticipated to be used for facility or resource construction and
operation.
(b) The owner of the facility or resource shall be responsible for
damage to county roads and bridges caused by construction or operation of
the facility or resource, as documented by comparison to the
preconstruction video survey described in subdivision (1)(a) of this
section.
(c) An owner of a facility or resource and a county may enter into a
road-use agreement specifying maintenance responsibilities, repair
standards, and financial arrangements. Any such agreement shall be
-9-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
completed before commencement of construction of the facility or
resource.
(2)(a) If construction or operation of the renewable energy
generation facility or energy storage resource damages subsurface
drainage tile or surface drainage systems, the owner of the facility or
resource shall repair or replace such systems within thirty days after
notification of such damage or before the next planting season, whichever
comes first.
(b) The owner of the facility or resource shall engage qualified
professionals to locate and map subsurface drainage tile in the area of
the proposed renewable energy generation facility or energy storage
resource before construction and shall provide such mapping to affected
landowners.
(3)(a) The owner of a renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource shall segregate and stockpile topsoil separately from
subsoil during construction.
(b) Upon completion of construction, the owner of the facility or
resource shall restore topsoil to its original depth and condition and
restore soil compaction to levels suitable for agricultural production
within one growing season.
(4)(a) The owner of a renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource shall compensate landowners for crop damage or loss
resulting from construction or operation of the facility or resource at
rates based on county average crop prices as determined by the United
States Department of Agriculture National Agricultural Statistics
Service.
(b) Compensation shall include any loss of production during
construction and any reduction in yields resulting from soil compaction,
drainage issues, or other facility or resource impacts during the
following growing seasons until full productivity is restored.
(5) The owner of a renewable energy generation facility or energy
-10-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
storage resource shall repair or replace fences, irrigation systems,
terraces, and other agricultural infrastructure damage during
construction of the facility or resource to their preconstruction
condition or shall compensate the landowner for such damage.
Sec. 13. The owner of a renewable energy generation facility or
energy storage resource shall control noxious weeds on the property of
the facility or resource in accordance with sections 2-952 to 2-955.01
and shall not allow weeds to spread to adjacent agricultural land.
Sec. 14. (1) The owner of a renewable energy generation facility or
energy storage resource shall prepare and provide to local emergency
responders an emergency response plan that includes facility layout,
electrical hazards, access points, emergency contacts, and shutdown
procedures.
(2) The owner of the facility or resource shall also provide annual
safety training to local emergency responders at no cost to the county or
emergency services.
Sec. 15. Political subdivisions may require a bond or other
financial security other than an escrow account or cash deposit in an
amount not to exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of the reasonable
estimated amount necessary to ensure completion of any required road
repairs related to the construction of a renewable energy generation
facility or energy storage resource. The political subdivision shall
release any such financial security upon completion of construction and
satisfactory repair of any road damage.
Sec. 16. Political subdivisions may require the owner of a
renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource to
maintain general liability insurance in commercially reasonable amounts
and to name the political subdivision as an additional insured on such
policies.
Sec. 17. (1) Before commencing the construction of any renewable
energy generation facility or energy storage resource, the owner of the
-11-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
facility or resource shall obtain a permit under the Nameplate Capacity
Tax Facility Standards Act. To obtain such permit, the owner shall file
an application with the county board of each county such facility or
resource is located in.
(2) A complete application for a permit under the Nameplate Capacity
Tax Facility Standards Act shall include, at a minimum:
(a) Site plans showing the proposed location of all renewable energy
generation facilities or energy storage resources and associated
infrastructure;
(b) Engineering studies or manufacturer specifications demonstrating
compliance with setback, height, and noise standards established in the
Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act;
(c) The decommissioning estimate described in subsection (1) of
section 7 of this act;
(d) Documentation of notice to affected landowners and public
officials as required by resolution; and
(e) Payment of applicable filing fees established by resolution.
(3) A county board may require additional information for the
application in addition to the requirements described in subsection (2)
of this section only if such information is reasonably necessary to
evaluate compliance with the specific standards established in the
Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act and is specified in a
resolution adopted before the application is filed.
Sec. 18. (1) For any renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource with a nameplate capacity of less than twenty-five
megawatts, county boards shall approve or deny any application filed
pursuant to section 17 of this act for such facility or resource within
forty-five days after receiving a complete application. Failure of a
county board to act on the application within forty-five days after such
receipt shall constitute automatic approval of the application.
(2) For any renewable energy generation facility or energy storage
-12-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
resource with a nameplate capacity of twenty-five megawatts or greater,
county boards shall approve or deny any application filed pursuant to
section 17 of this act for such facility or resource within ninety days
after receiving a complete application. Failure of a county board to act
on the application within ninety days after such receipt shall constitute
automatic approval of the application.
(3) A permit applicant and a county board may agree in writing to
extend the timelines described in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.
(4) The timelines described in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section begin when an application is complete or is deemed complete
pursuant to subsection (6) or (7) of this section, and any application
not determined to be complete by a county board or deemed complete
pursuant to subsection (6) or (7) of this section within ninety days
after filing shall be deemed complete.
(5) Within fifteen days after receiving an application for any
permit for a renewable energy generation facility or energy storage
resource, a county board shall notify the permit applicant in writing
whether the application is complete or identify with specificity:
(a) Each item of information or documentation required by the
Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act or by resolution adopted
prior to application filing that is missing or deficient; and
(b) The specific statute or resolution that requires such
information or documentation.
(6) Failure to notify the permit applicant within fifteen business
days, or failure to identify deficiencies with the specificity required
by subsection (5) of this section, shall result in the application being
deemed complete.
(7) After notifying a permit applicant of deficiencies, the county
shall have five business days after receiving the requested information
or documentation to determine whether the deficiencies have been cured.
-13-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
Failure to respond within five business days shall result in the
application being deemed complete.
(8) A county board may not request additional information beyond
that specified in the notification under subsection (5) of this section
except to address issues that could not reasonably have been identified
in the initial review of the application.
(9) The county board shall approve such application if, upon review,
the construction of the renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource is in the best interests of the public and issue the
permit for construction.
Sec. 19. (1) Any permit applicant aggrieved by the denial of an
application filed pursuant to section 17 of this act may appeal such
denial to the district court of a county in which the renewable energy
generation facility or energy storage resource is proposed to be located.
(2) Appeals under this section shall be filed within thirty days
after a county board's denial of the application.
(3) The court shall review the county board's denial to determine
whether the denial was:
(a) Arbitrary and capricious;
(b) Based on a determination of fact that is not supported by
evidence in the record; or
(c) Contrary to law or in excess of the county board's authority
under the Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act.
(4) If the court finds that the denial meets any one of the
conditions described in subsection (3) of this section, the court shall
remand the matter to the county board with instructions to approve the
permit or to reconsider the application consistent with the court's
findings.
(5) A prevailing permit applicant shall be entitled to recover
reasonable attorney's fees and costs from the county.
Sec. 20. (1) Political subdivisions may include ongoing compliance
-14-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
with the standards described in sections 5 to 16 of this act as
additional conditions on any permit issued for a renewable energy
generation facility or energy storage resource.
(2) Noncompliance with such standards shall not affect the validity
of any permit issued but may subject the owner of a renewable energy
generation facility or energy storage resource to enforcement actions by
affected landowners and to sanctions by political subdivisions for
noncompliance.
Sec. 21. Nothing in the Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards
Act shall prohibit the owner of a renewable energy generation facility or
energy storage resource from voluntarily agreeing to more restrictive
standards as part of private agreements with affected landowners.
Sec. 22. The Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act shall
not apply to customer-generators as defined in section 70-2002.
Sec. 23. (1) The governing body of a political subdivision imposing
any of the standards described in sections 5 to 16 of this act on a
renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource shall
adopt such standards by resolution following a public hearing with at
least ten days' published notice.
(2) Any ordinance, resolution, or regulation in effect on January 1,
2027, that imposes requirements more restrictive than standards described
in sections 5 to 16 of this act shall be void and unenforceable as
applied to:
(a) Renewable energy generation facilities or energy storage
resources permitted on or after January 1, 2027; and
(b) Renewable energy generation facilities or energy storage
resources permitted before January 1, 2027, if the permit holder elects
in writing to be subject to the standards described in sections 5 to 16
of this act.
(3)(a) Any permits for renewable energy generation facilities or
energy storage resources granted by a political subdivision before
-15-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
January 1, 2027, pursuant to an ordinance, resolution, or regulation in
effect at the time the permit was granted shall remain valid and
enforceable.
(b) Nothing in the Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act
shall be construed to invalidate or impair such permits or the rights
granted thereunder unless the permitholder makes the election under
subdivision (2)(b) of this section.
(4) The holder of any permit described in subdivision (3)(a) of this
section shall have the right to maintain the permitted facility or
resource, including replacing all wind turbine generators, solar panel
arrays, and energy storage containers, to the extent allowed under such
permit without obtaining a new permit or amending an existing permit
other than a ministerial zoning or building permit required for
informational purposes only.
(5) A permitholder's election under subdivision (2)(b) of this
section shall be irrevocable once made and shall apply to all aspects of
the renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource. Upon
the election, the permitholder shall comply with all requirements of the
Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act.
Sec. 24. (1) An owner of a renewable energy generation facility or
energy storage resource aggrieved by a political subdivision's imposition
of requirements more restrictive than the standards described in sections
5 to 16 of this act may bring an action in district court for declaratory
and injunctive relief.
(2) A court finding that a political subdivision has imposed
requirements more restrictive than the standards described in sections 5
to 16 of this act shall award reasonable attorney's fees and costs to a
prevailing facility or resource owner.
Sec. 25. (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that any permit a
political subdivision may grant for a renewable energy generation
facility and energy storage resource is no more restrictive on such
-16-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
facility or resource than the standards described in sections 5 to 16 of
this act.
(2) Political subdivisions have only the authority expressly granted
in the Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act with respect to
renewable energy generation facilities and energy storage resources.
Counties may adopt less restrictive standards for facilities and
resources than the standards described in sections 5 to 16 of this act
but may not impose any additional requirements.
(3) Political subdivisions shall not adopt or enforce any ordinance,
resolution, or regulation that imposes standards or requirements more
restrictive than the standards described in sections 5 to 16 of this act
with respect to renewable energy generation facilities or energy storage
resources.
(4) The Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act shall preempt
and supersede any conflicting local ordinance, resolution, or regulation
to the extent of such conflict. Political subdivisions retain authority
to impose less restrictive requirements on or approve permits that do not
impose any discretionary requirements beyond ministerial building and
zoning permits for renewable energy generation facilities or energy
storage resources.
(5) Nothing in the Nameplate Capacity Tax Facility Standards Act
shall be construed to limit the authority of political subdivisions to
regulate land use for purposes other than renewable energy generation
facilities or energy storage resources.
Sec. 26. Section 13-518, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
13-518 For purposes of sections 13-518 to 13-522:
(1) Allowable growth means (a) for governmental units other than
community colleges, the percentage increase in taxable valuation in
excess of the base limitation established under section 77-3446, if any,
due to (i) improvements to real property as a result of new construction
-17-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
and additions to existing buildings, (ii) any other improvements to real
property which increase the value of such property, (iii) any increase in
valuation due to annexation of real property by the governmental unit,
(iv) a change in the use of real property, (v) any increase in personal
property valuation over the prior year, and (vi) the accumulated excess
valuation over the redevelopment project valuation described in section
18-2147 of the Community Development Law for redevelopment projects
within the governmental unit in the year immediately after the division
of taxes for such redevelopment project has ended and (b) for community
colleges, the percentage increase in excess of the base limitation, if
any, in full-time equivalent students from the second year to the first
year preceding the year for which the budget is being determined;
(2) Capital improvements means (a) acquisition of real property or
(b) acquisition, construction, or extension of any improvements on real
property;
(3) Governing body has the same meaning as in section 13-503, except
that for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, such term shall
not include the governing body of any county, city, or village;
(4) Governmental unit means every political subdivision which has
authority to levy a property tax or authority to request levy authority
under section 77-3443, except that such term shall not include (a)
sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence for five
years or less, (b) school districts, or (c) for fiscal years beginning on
or after July 1, 2025, counties, cities, or villages;
(5) Qualified sinking fund means a fund or funds maintained
separately from the general fund to pay for acquisition or replacement of
tangible personal property with a useful life of five years or more which
is to be undertaken in the future but is to be paid for in part or in
total in advance using periodic payments into the fund. The term includes
sinking funds under subdivision (13) of section 35-508 for firefighting
and rescue equipment or apparatus;
-18-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
(6) Restricted funds means (a) property tax, excluding any amounts
refunded to taxpayers, (b) payments in lieu of property taxes, (c) local
option sales taxes, (d) motor vehicle taxes, (e) state aid, (f) transfers
of surpluses from any user fee, permit fee, or regulatory fee if the fee
surplus is transferred to fund a service or function not directly related
to the fee and the costs of the activity funded from the fee, (g) any
funds excluded from restricted funds for the prior year because they were
budgeted for capital improvements but which were not spent and are not
expected to be spent for capital improvements, (h) the tax provided in
sections 77-27,223 to 77-27,227 beginning in the second fiscal year in
which the county will receive a full year of receipts, and (i) any excess
tax collections returned to the county under section 77-1776. Funds
received pursuant to the nameplate capacity tax levied under section
77-6203 for the first five years after a renewable energy generation
facility or energy storage resource has been commissioned are
nonrestricted funds; and
(7) State aid means:
(a) For all governmental units, state aid paid pursuant to sections
60-3,202 and 77-3523 and reimbursement provided pursuant to section
77-1239;
(b) For municipalities, state aid to municipalities paid pursuant to
sections 39-2501 to 39-2520, 60-3,190, and 77-27,139.04 and insurance
premium tax paid to municipalities;
(c) For counties, state aid to counties paid pursuant to sections
60-3,184 to 60-3,190, insurance premium tax paid to counties, and
reimbursements to counties from funds appropriated pursuant to section
29-3933;
(d) For community colleges, state aid to community colleges paid
pursuant to the Community College Aid Act;
(e) For educational service units, state aid appropriated under
sections 79-1241.01 and 79-1241.03; and
-19-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
(f) For local public health departments as defined in section
71-1626, state aid as distributed under section 71-1628.08.
Sec. 27. Section 77-105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-105 The term tangible personal property includes all personal
property possessing a physical existence, excluding money. The term
tangible personal property also includes trade fixtures, which means
machinery and equipment, regardless of the degree of attachment to real
property, used directly in commercial, manufacturing, or processing
activities conducted on real property, regardless of whether the real
property is owned or leased, and all depreciable tangible personal
property described in subsection (9) of section 77-202 used in the
generation of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as
the fuel source or in the storage of such electricity in an energy
storage resource as defined in section 77-6202. The term intangible
personal property includes all other personal property, including money.
Sec. 28. Section 77-202, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-202 (1) The following property shall be exempt from property
taxes:
(a) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions to the
extent used or being developed for use by the state or governmental
subdivision for a public purpose. For purposes of this subdivision:
(i) Property of the state and its governmental subdivisions means
(A) property held in fee title by the state or a governmental subdivision
or (B) property beneficially owned by the state or a governmental
subdivision in that it is used for a public purpose and is being acquired
under a lease-purchase agreement, financing lease, or other instrument
which provides for transfer of legal title to the property to the state
or a governmental subdivision upon payment of all amounts due thereunder.
If the property to be beneficially owned by a governmental subdivision
-20-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
has a total acquisition cost that exceeds the threshold amount or will be
used as the site of a public building with a total estimated construction
cost that exceeds the threshold amount, then such property shall qualify
for an exemption under this section only if the question of acquiring
such property or constructing such public building has been submitted at
a primary, general, or special election held within the governmental
subdivision and has been approved by the voters of the governmental
subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, threshold amount means the
greater of fifty thousand dollars or six-tenths of one percent of the
total actual value of real and personal property of the governmental
subdivision that will beneficially own the property as of the end of the
governmental subdivision's prior fiscal year; and
(ii) Public purpose means use of the property (A) to provide public
services with or without cost to the recipient, including the general
operation of government, public education, public safety, transportation,
public works, civil and criminal justice, public health and welfare,
developments by a public housing authority, parks, culture, recreation,
community development, and cemetery purposes, or (B) to carry out the
duties and responsibilities conferred by law with or without
consideration. Public purpose does not include leasing of property to a
private party unless the lease of the property is at fair market value
for a public purpose. Leases of property by a public housing authority to
low-income individuals as a place of residence are for the authority's
public purpose;
(b) Unleased property of the state or its governmental subdivisions
which is not being used or developed for use for a public purpose but
upon which a payment in lieu of taxes is paid for public safety, rescue,
and emergency services and road or street construction or maintenance
services to all governmental units providing such services to the
property. Except as provided in Article VIII, section 11, of the
Constitution of Nebraska, the payment in lieu of taxes shall be based on
-21-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
the proportionate share of the cost of providing public safety, rescue,
or emergency services and road or street construction or maintenance
services unless a general policy is adopted by the governing body of the
governmental subdivision providing such services which provides for a
different method of determining the amount of the payment in lieu of
taxes. The governing body may adopt a general policy by ordinance or
resolution for determining the amount of payment in lieu of taxes by
majority vote after a hearing on the ordinance or resolution. Such
ordinance or resolution shall nevertheless result in an equitable
contribution for the cost of providing such services to the exempt
property;
(c) Property owned by and used exclusively for agricultural and
horticultural societies;
(d)(i) Property owned by educational, religious, charitable, or
cemetery organizations, or any organization for the exclusive benefit of
any such educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery organization,
and used exclusively for educational, religious, charitable, or cemetery
purposes, when such property is not (A) owned or used for financial gain
or profit to either the owner or user, (B) used for the sale of alcoholic
liquors for more than twenty hours per week, or (C) owned or used by an
organization which discriminates in membership or employment based on
race, color, or national origin.
(ii) For purposes of subdivision (1)(d) of this section:
(A) Educational organization means (I) an institution operated
exclusively for the purpose of offering regular courses with systematic
instruction in academic, vocational, or technical subjects or assisting
students through services relating to the origination, processing, or
guarantying of federally reinsured student loans for higher education,
(II) a museum or historical society operated exclusively for the benefit
and education of the public, or (III) a nonprofit organization that owns
or operates a child care facility; and
-22-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
(B) Charitable organization includes (I) an organization operated
exclusively for the purpose of the mental, social, or physical benefit of
the public or an indefinite number of persons and (II) a fraternal
benefit society organized and licensed under sections 44-1072 to
44-10,109.
(iii) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i)
of this section shall apply to any for-profit skilled nursing facility,
for-profit nursing facility, or for-profit assisted-living facility that
provides housing for medicaid beneficiaries, except that the exemption
amount for such property shall be a percentage of the property taxes that
would otherwise be due. Such percentage shall be equal to the average
percentage of occupied beds in the facility provided to medicaid
beneficiaries over the most recent three-year period. This subdivision
shall not be construed to modify, limit, or reduce any property tax
exemption provided to a nonprofit skilled nursing facility, nonprofit
nursing facility, or nonprofit assisted-living facility pursuant to
subdivision (1)(d)(i) of this section. For purposes of this subdivision,
skilled nursing facility has the same meaning as in section 71-429,
nursing facility has the same meaning as in section 71-424, and assisted-
living facility has the same meaning as in section 71-5903.
(iv) The property tax exemption authorized in subdivision (1)(d)(i)
of this section shall apply to a building that (A) is owned by a
charitable organization, (B) is made available to students in attendance
at an educational institution, and (C) is recognized by such educational
institution as approved student housing, except that the exemption shall
only apply to the commons area of such building, including any common
rooms and cooking and eating facilities;
(e) Household goods and personal effects not owned or used for
financial gain or profit to either the owner or user; and
(f) A portion of the property owned by a taxpayer as provided in the
Recreational Trail Easement Property Tax Exemption Act.
-23-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
(2) The increased value of land by reason of shade and ornamental
trees planted along the highway shall not be taken into account in the
valuation of land.
(3) Tangible personal property which is not depreciable tangible
personal property as defined in section 77-119 shall be exempt from
property tax.
(4) Motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers required to be
registered for operation on the highways of this state shall be exempt
from payment of property taxes.
(5) Business and agricultural inventory shall be exempt from the
personal property tax. For purposes of this subsection, business
inventory includes personal property owned for purposes of leasing or
renting such property to others for financial gain only if the personal
property is of a type which in the ordinary course of business is leased
or rented thirty days or less and may be returned at the option of the
lessee or renter at any time and the personal property is of a type which
would be considered household goods or personal effects if owned by an
individual. All other personal property owned for purposes of leasing or
renting such property to others for financial gain shall not be
considered business inventory.
(6) Any personal property exempt pursuant to subsection (2) of
section 77-4105 or section 77-5209.02 shall be exempt from the personal
property tax.
(7) Livestock shall be exempt from the personal property tax.
(8) Any personal property exempt pursuant to the Nebraska Advantage
Act or the ImagiNE Nebraska Act shall be exempt from the personal
property tax.
(9) Any depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind as the fuel source or in the storage
of such electricity in an energy storage resource as defined in section
77-6202 shall be exempt from the property tax levied on depreciable
-24-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
tangible personal property. Any depreciable tangible personal property
used directly in the generation of electricity using solar, biomass, or
landfill gas as the fuel source or in the storage of such electricity in
an energy storage resource as defined in section 77-6202 shall be exempt
from the property tax levied on depreciable tangible personal property if
such depreciable tangible personal property was installed on or after
January 1, 2016, and has a nameplate capacity of one hundred kilowatts or
more. Depreciable tangible personal property used directly in the
generation or storage of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or
landfill gas as the fuel source includes, but is not limited to, wind
turbines, rotors and blades, towers, solar panels, trackers, generating
equipment, transmission components, substations, supporting structures or
racks, inverters, and other system components such as wiring, control
systems, switchgears, and generator step-up transformers, battery
modules, battery racks, power conversion systems, battery enclosures,
battery cells, and battery management systems.
(10) Any tangible personal property that is acquired by a person
operating a data center located in this state, that is assembled,
engineered, processed, fabricated, manufactured into, attached to, or
incorporated into other tangible personal property, both in component
form or that of an assembled product, for the purpose of subsequent use
at a physical location outside this state by the person operating a data
center shall be exempt from the personal property tax. Such exemption
extends to keeping, retaining, or exercising any right or power over
tangible personal property in this state for the purpose of subsequently
transporting it outside this state for use thereafter outside this state.
For purposes of this subsection, data center means computers, supporting
equipment, and other organized assembly of hardware or software that are
designed to centralize the storage, management, or dissemination of data
and information, environmentally controlled structures or facilities or
interrelated structures or facilities that provide the infrastructure for
-25-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
housing the equipment, such as raised flooring, electricity supply,
communication and data lines, Internet access, cooling, security, and
fire suppression, and any building housing the foregoing.
(11) For tax years prior to tax year 2020, each person who owns
property required to be reported to the county assessor under section
77-1201 shall be allowed an exemption amount as provided in the Personal
Property Tax Relief Act. For tax years prior to tax year 2020, each
person who owns property required to be valued by the state as provided
in section 77-601, 77-682, 77-801, or 77-1248 shall be allowed a
compensating exemption factor as provided in the Personal Property Tax
Relief Act.
(12)(a) Broadband equipment shall be exempt from the personal
property tax if such broadband equipment is:
(i) Deployed in an area funded in whole or in part by funds from the
Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program, authorized by the
federal Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Public Law 117-58; or
(ii) Deployed in a qualified census tract located within the
corporate limits of a city of the metropolitan class and being utilized
to provide end-users with access to the Internet at speeds of at least
one hundred megabits per second for downloading and at least one hundred
megabits per second for uploading.
(b) An owner of broadband equipment seeking an exemption under this
section shall apply for an exemption to the county assessor on or before
December 31 of the year preceding the year for which the exemption is to
begin. If the broadband equipment meets the criteria described in this
subsection, the county assessor shall approve the application within
thirty calendar days after receiving the application. The application
shall be on forms prescribed by the Tax Commissioner.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Broadband communications service means telecommunications
service as defined in section 86-121, video programming as defined in 47
-26-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
U.S.C. 522, as such section existed on January 1, 2024, or Internet
access as defined in section 1104 of the federal Internet Tax Freedom
Act, Public Law 105-277;
(ii) Broadband equipment means machinery or equipment used to
provide broadband communications service and includes, but is not limited
to, wires, cables, fiber, conduits, antennas, poles, switches, routers,
amplifiers, rectifiers, repeaters, receivers, multiplexers, duplexers,
transmitters, circuit cards, insulating and protective materials and
cases, power equipment, backup power equipment, diagnostic equipment,
storage devices, modems, and other general central office or headend
equipment, such as channel cards, frames, and cabinets, or equipment used
in successor technologies, including items used to monitor, test,
maintain, enable, or facilitate qualifying equipment, machinery,
software, ancillary components, appurtenances, accessories, or other
infrastructure that is used in whole or in part to provide broadband
communications service. Machinery or equipment used to produce broadband
communications service does not include personal consumer electronics,
including, but not limited to, smartphones, computers, and tablets; and
(iii) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as
defined in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on
January 1, 2024.
Sec. 29. Section 77-1359, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-1359 The Legislature finds and declares that agricultural land
and horticultural land shall be a separate and distinct class of real
property for purposes of assessment. The assessed value of agricultural
land and horticultural land shall not be uniform and proportionate with
all other real property, but the assessed value shall be uniform and
proportionate within the class of agricultural land and horticultural
land.
For purposes of this section and section 77-1363:
-27-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
(1)(a) Agricultural land and horticultural land means a parcel of
land, excluding land associated with a building or enclosed structure
located on the parcel, which is primarily used for agricultural or
horticultural purposes, including wasteland lying in or adjacent to and
in common ownership or management with other agricultural land and
horticultural land.
(b) Agricultural land and horticultural land includes does not
include land used for a renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource commercial purposes that are not agricultural or
horticultural purposes, such as land used for a solar farm or wind farm;
(2)(a) Agricultural or horticultural purposes means used for the
commercial production of any plant or animal product in a raw or
unprocessed state that is derived from the science and art of
agriculture, aquaculture, or horticulture.
(b) Agricultural or horticultural purposes includes the following
uses of land:
(i) Land retained or protected for future agricultural or
horticultural purposes under a conservation easement as provided in the
Conservation and Preservation Easements Act except when the parcel or a
portion thereof is being used for purposes other than agricultural or
horticultural purposes; and
(ii) Land enrolled in a federal or state program in which payments
are received for removing such land from agricultural or horticultural
production; and .
(iii) Land used for a renewable energy generation facility or an
energy storage resource or any infrastructure serving or appurtenant or
accessory to such a use.
(c) Whether a parcel of land is primarily used for agricultural or
horticultural purposes shall be determined without regard to whether some
or all of the parcel is platted and subdivided into separate lots or
developed with improvements consisting of streets, sidewalks, curbs,
-28-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
gutters, sewer lines, water lines, or utility lines;
(3) Energy storage resource has the same meaning as in section
77-6202;
(4) (3) Farm home site means land contiguous to a farm site which
includes an inhabitable residence and improvements used for residential
purposes and which is located outside of urban areas or outside a platted
and zoned subdivision; and
(5) (4) Farm site means the portion of land contiguous to land
actively devoted to agriculture which includes improvements that are
agricultural or horticultural in nature, including any uninhabitable or
unimproved farm home site; and .
(6) Renewable energy generation facility has the same meaning as in
section 77-6202.
Sec. 30. Section 77-6201, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-6201 The Legislature finds and declares:
(1) The purpose of the nameplate capacity tax levied under section
77-6203 is to replace property taxes currently imposed on renewable
energy and energy storage infrastructure and depreciated over a short
period of time in a way that causes local budgeting challenges and
increases upfront costs for renewable energy developers;
(2) The nameplate capacity tax should be competitive with taxes
imposed directly and indirectly on renewable energy generation, storage,
and development in other states;
(3) The nameplate capacity tax should be fair and nondiscriminatory
when compared with other taxes imposed on other industries in the state;
and
(4) The nameplate capacity tax should not be singled out as a source
of General Fund revenue during times of economic hardship.
Sec. 31. Section 77-6202, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-29-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
77-6202 For purposes of sections 77-6201 to 77-6204:
(1) Commissioned means the renewable energy generation facility or
energy storage resource has been in commercial operation for at least
twenty-four hours. A renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource is not in commercial operation unless the renewable
energy generation facility or energy storage resource is connected and
transmitting energy to the electrical grid, to an associated renewable
energy generation facility, or to the end user if the renewable energy
generation facility is a customer-generator as defined in section
70-2002;
(2) Energy storage resource means equipment or systems that are co-
located with a renewable energy generation facility and capable of
receiving electrical energy, storing such energy, and discharging such
energy, with a nameplate capacity of one hundred kilowatts or more. An
energy storage resource shall be co-located with a renewable energy
generation facility if it is located on the same parcel of land or on
parcels of land that are contiguous to and under common ownership or
lease with the parcel on which the renewable energy generation facility
is located. Energy storage resource does not include any device or
equipment intended solely to inject or absorb reactive power, including
any capacitor and synchronous condenser, or to provide power for electric
vehicles;
(3) (2) Nameplate capacity means the capacity of (a) a renewable
energy generation facility to generate electricity as measured in
megawatts, including fractions of a megawatt, or (b) an energy storage
resource to store electricity as measured in megawatts, including
fractions of a megawatt. Nameplate capacity shall be determined based on
the facility's alternating current capacity of the facility or resource;
and
(4) Permitted means the proposed renewable energy generation
facility or energy storage resource has received one or more government
-30-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
permits or licenses associated with the proposed facility or resource;
and
(5) (3) Renewable energy generation facility means (a) a facility
that generates electricity using wind as the fuel source or (b) a
facility that generates electricity using solar, biomass, or landfill gas
as the fuel source if such facility was installed on or after January 1,
2016, and has a nameplate capacity of one hundred kilowatts or more.
Sec. 32. Section 77-6203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-6203 (1)(a) (1) The owner of a renewable energy generation
facility permitted before January 1, 2027, annually shall annually pay a
nameplate capacity tax equal to the total nameplate capacity of the
commissioned renewable energy generation facility multiplied by a tax
rate of three thousand five hundred eighteen dollars per megawatt.
(b) The owner of a privately owned renewable energy generation
facility permitted on or after January 1, 2027, that generates
electricity using wind or solar as the fuel source shall annually pay a
nameplate capacity tax equal to the total nameplate capacity of the
commissioned renewable energy generation facility multiplied by a tax
rate of three thousand five hundred and eighteen dollars per megawatt.
(c) The owner of a privately owned and permitted energy storage
resource shall annually pay a nameplate capacity tax equal to the total
nameplate capacity of the commissioned energy storage resource multiplied
by a tax rate of three thousand five hundred eighteen dollars per
megawatt.
(2) No tax shall be imposed on a renewable energy generation
facility or energy storage resource:
(a) Owned or operated by the federal government, the State of
Nebraska, a public power district, a public power and irrigation
district, an individual municipality, a registered group of
municipalities, an electric membership association, or a cooperative; or
-31-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
(b) That is a customer-generator as defined in section 70-2002.
(3) No tax levied pursuant to this section shall be construed to
constitute restricted funds as defined in section 13-518 for the first
five years after the renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource is commissioned.
(4) The presence of one or more renewable energy generation
facilities, energy storage resources, or supporting infrastructure shall
not be a factor in the assessment, determination of actual value, or
classification under section 77-201 of the real property underlying or
adjacent to such facilities, resources, or infrastructure.
(5)(a)(i) On or before March 1 of each year, the owner of a
renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource subject
to the nameplate capacity tax shall file a report with the county
treasurer of each county in which the facility or resource is located and
provide a copy of such report to the Department of Revenue.
(ii) The report shall state the nameplate capacity of the facility
or resource for the prior calendar year from January 1 through December
31 and shall be on a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue.
(b) Upon receipt of the report filed pursuant to subdivision (5)(a)
of this section, the county treasurer shall calculate the amount of the
nameplate capacity tax based on the reported nameplate capacity and the
tax rate provided in subsection (1) of this section. The county treasurer
shall, prior to April 1 of each year, notify the owner of the amount of
tax due and the date such tax is due.
(c) The Department of Revenue shall review all reports filed
pursuant to subdivision (5)(a) of this section for accuracy, consistency,
and compliance with this section. The Department of Revenue may audit
facilities as necessary to verify reported nameplate capacity. (5)(a) The
Department of Revenue shall collect the tax due under this section.
(d) (b) The tax shall be imposed beginning the first calendar year
the renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource is
-32-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
commissioned. A renewable energy generation facility that uses wind as
the fuel source which was commissioned prior to July 15, 2010, shall be
subject to the tax levied pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 on and
after January 1, 2010. The amount of property tax on depreciable tangible
personal property previously paid on a renewable energy generation
facility that uses wind as the fuel source which was commissioned prior
to July 15, 2010, which is greater than the amount that would have been
paid pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 from the date of
commissioning until January 1, 2010, shall be credited against any tax
due under Chapter 77, and any amount so credited that is unused in any
tax year shall be carried over to subsequent tax years until fully
utilized. The amount of property tax on depreciable tangible personal
property previously paid on an energy storage resource which was
commissioned before January 1, 2027, which is greater than the amount
that would have been paid pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 from
the date of commissioning until January 1, 2027, shall be credited
against any tax due under Chapter 77, and any amount so credited that is
unused in any tax year shall be carried over to subsequent tax years
until fully utilized.
(e)(i) (c)(i) The tax for the first calendar year shall be prorated
based upon the number of days remaining in the calendar year after the
renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource is
commissioned.
(ii) In the first year in which a renewable energy generation
facility or energy storage resource is taxed or in any year in which
additional commissioned nameplate capacity is added to a renewable energy
generation facility or energy storage resource, the taxes on the initial
or additional nameplate capacity shall be prorated for the number of days
remaining in the calendar year.
(iii) When a renewable energy generation facility or energy storage
resource is decommissioned or made nonoperational by a change in law
-33-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
during a tax year, the taxes shall be prorated for the number of days
during which the renewable energy generation facility or energy storage
resource was not decommissioned or was operational.
(iv) When the capacity of a renewable energy generation facility or
energy storage resource to produce or store electricity is reduced but
the renewable energy generation facility or energy storage resource is
not decommissioned, the nameplate capacity of the renewable energy
generation facility or energy storage resource is deemed to be unchanged.
(6)(a) On March 1 of each year, the owner of a renewable energy
generation facility shall file with the Department of Revenue a report on
the nameplate capacity of the facility for the previous year from January
1 through December 31. All taxes imposed by this section shall be due on
April 1 and shall be delinquent if not paid to the county treasurer of
each county in which the renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource is located. on a quarterly basis on April 1 and each
quarter thereafter. Delinquent quarterly payments shall draw interest at
the rate provided for in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to
time be adjusted.
(b) The owner of a renewable energy generation facility or energy
storage resource is liable for the taxes under this section with respect
to the facility or resource, whether or not the owner of the facility or
resource is the owner of the land on which the facility or resource is
situated.
(7) Failure to file a report required by subsection (6) of this
section, filing such report late, failure to pay taxes due, or
underpayment of such taxes shall result in a penalty of five percent of
the amount due being imposed for each quarter the report is overdue or
the payment is delinquent, except that the penalty shall not exceed ten
thousand dollars.
(8) The Department of Revenue shall enforce the provisions of this
section. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
-34-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
to:
(a) Prescribe the form and content of reports required under
subsection (5) of this section;
(b) Establish audit procedures and standards for verifying nameplate
capacity reported under subsection (5) of this section;
(c) Ensure consistent calculation and collection of the nameplate
capacity tax across all counties; and
(d) Establish procedures for assessing penalties authorized under
subsection (7) of this section for failure to file required reports, late
filing, failure to pay taxes due, or underpayment of taxes. necessary for
the implementation and enforcement of this section.
(9) The county treasurer shall distribute all revenue received
pursuant to this section as provided in section 77-6204 within thirty
days after receipt of such revenue. The Department of Revenue shall
separately identify the proceeds from the tax imposed by this section and
shall pay all such proceeds over to the county treasurer of the county
where the renewable energy generation facility is located within thirty
days after receipt of such proceeds.
(10) Each county treasurer shall report annually to the Department
of Revenue the total amount of nameplate capacity tax collected under
this section for audit and verification purposes.
Sec. 33. Section 77-6204, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-6204 (1)(a) (1) The county treasurer shall distribute all revenue
received from taxes imposed on renewable energy generation facilities and
energy storage resources permitted before January 1, 2027, the Department
of Revenue pursuant to section 77-6203 as follows:
(i) (a) Five percent of such revenue shall be distributed to the
community college area in which the renewable energy generation facility
is located; and
(ii) (b) The remainder of such revenue shall be distributed to local
-35-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
taxing entities which, but for such personal property tax exemption,
would have received distribution of personal property tax revenue from
depreciable personal property used directly in the generation of
electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as the fuel
source or in the storage of such electricity in an energy storage
resource.
(b) The county treasurer shall distribute all revenue from taxes
imposed on renewable energy generation facilities and energy storage
resources permitted on or after January 1, 2027, pursuant to section
77-6203 as follows:
(i) Ninety-five percent of such revenue shall be distributed to the
counties in proportion to the amount of tax paid by renewable energy
generation facilities or energy storage resources physically located in
each county. If the facility or resource is located entirely within one
county, all such revenue from the tax paid by such facility or resource
shall be distributed to that county. If the facility or resource is
located in more than one county, the revenue from the tax paid by such
facility or resource shall be apportioned among such counties in
proportion to the amount of nameplate capacity of the facility or
resource that is physically located within each county's boundaries;
(ii) Five percent of such revenue shall be distributed to the
community college areas, as defined in section 85-1503, in proportion to
the amount of tax paid by renewable energy generation facilities or
energy storage resources physically located in each community college
area. If the facility or resource is located entirely within one
community college area, all such revenue from the tax paid by such
facility or resource shall be distributed to that community college area.
If the facility or resource is located in more than one community college
area, the revenue from the tax paid by such facility or resource shall be
apportioned among such community college areas in proportion to the
amount of nameplate capacity of the facility or resource that is
-36-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
physically located within each community college area's boundaries.
(2) A local taxing entity's status as eligible for distribution
under subdivision (1)(a)(ii) (1)(b) of this section shall not be affected
when and if the net book value of personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as
the fuel source or in the storage of such electricity in an energy
storage resource becomes zero. A local taxing entity's status as eligible
for distribution under such subdivision shall be affected by the disposal
of all of the exempt depreciable personal property used directly in the
generation of electricity using wind, solar, biomass, or landfill gas as
the fuel source or in the storage of such electricity in an energy
storage resource.
(3) The distribution to each eligible local taxing entity under
subdivision (1)(a)(ii) (1)(b) of this section shall be calculated by
determining the amount of taxes that the eligible local taxing entity
levied during the taxable year and dividing this amount by the total tax
levied by all of the eligible local taxing entities during the year. Each
eligible entity's resulting fraction shall then be multiplied by the
amount of revenue available for distribution pursuant to subdivision (1)
(a)(ii) (1)(b) of this section to determine the portion of such revenue
due each local taxing entity.
(4) The Department of Revenue shall not retain any revenue collected
pursuant to sections 77-6201 to 77-6204 for distribution, use, transfer,
pledge, or allocation to or from the General Fund.
(5) Each county treasurer shall report annually to the Department of
Revenue the distribution of revenue under this section for audit and
verification purposes.
(6) For purposes of this section, the physical location of nameplate
capacity of a renewable energy generation facility or energy storage
resource shall be determined as follows:
(a) For wind energy generation facilities, by the location of each
-37-

LB1204 LB1204
2026 2026
wind turbine structure;
(b) For solar energy generation facilities, by the location of each
solar panel array; and
(c) For energy storage resources, by the location of each energy
storage container.
Sec. 34. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 35. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 36. Original sections 77-105 and 77-6201, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, sections 77-1359, 77-6202, and 77-6203, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 13-518, 77-202, and
77-6204, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-38-